Alabama, session 2026rs, HB187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
Alyssa's Law.
Section 2. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) EMPLOYEE. An employee of the State Department of
Education, any local board of education, or any public charter
school who has access to students during the school day. This
term includes, but is not limited to, teachers,
administrators, administrative staff, custodial staff,
maintenance staff, cafeteria staff, nurses, counselors, media
specialists, coaches, and bus drivers.
(2) GOVERNING BODY. Each local board of education and
the governing body of each public charter school.
(3) MOBILE EMERGENCY RAPID RESPONSE SYSTEM. A device
that shall be wearable or in the personal possession of the
individual which, upon activation: (i) immediately connects
directly to the locally serving public safety answering point;
and (ii) provides accurate location information to the room
and floor level inside the facility and to specific areas that
are part of school grounds including, but not limited to,
parking lots, playgrounds, and athletic fields.
(4) PUBLIC SAFETY ANSWERING POINT. The same meaning as
Section 11-98-1, Code of Alabama 1975.
(b)(1) No later than October 1, 2030, and subject to
annual dedicated school safety funds, each governing body
shall:
a. Adopt a policy designating which employees in the
Page 2

a. Adopt a policy designating which employees in the
HB187 INTRODUCED
corresponding school system will be equipped with a mobile
emergency rapid response system and when that system must be
worn or kept in the personal possession of the individual; and
b. Equip each designated employee with a mobile
emergency rapid response system. When activated by an
employee, the system must immediately connect to school system
or school emergency services and the local public safety
answering point.
(2) Each governing body shall provide regular training
to employees on the use of the mobile emergency rapid response
system used by the school.
(3) No policy adopted pursuant to this section may
require an employee to use his or her cell phone or other
personal device to comply with the requirements of the policy,
provided that a governing body may adopt a policy that gives
employees the option to use a personal device to comply if:
a. The governing body provides each employee with
written notification that the use of a personal device is not
required; and
b. The employee signs a consent form to indicate that
the employee opts in to the use of his or her personal device
to comply with the policy.
(c) The State Superintendent of Education shall develop
a list of approved vendors from which each governing body may
purchase approved mobile emergency rapid response systems.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
contrary, each governing body may use funding from any of the
following sources to comply with this section:
Page 3

following sources to comply with this section:
HB187 INTRODUCED
(1) The K-12 Capital Grant Program created pursuant to
Section 29-4-51, Code of Alabama 1975.
(2) The Education Trust Fund Advancement and Technology
Fund created pursuant to Section 29-9-4, Code of Alabama 1975.
(3) The School Security and Fire Safety Fund created
pursuant to Section 16-22B-3, Code of Alabama 1975.
(4) Any other available funds or funding sources.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 4